prince/dictionaries/ca.aff
SFX A   quava  qüessin     quava            #    adeqüessin
SFX A   guava  güessen     guava            #    enaigüessen
SFX A   quava  qüessen     quava            #    adeqüessen
SFX A   cava   quessin     cava             #    cerquessin
SFX A   cava   quessen     cava             #    cerquessen
SFX A   çava   cessin      çava             #    cacessin
SFX A   çava   cessen      çava             #    cacessen
SFX A   gava   guessin     gava             #    porguessin
SFX A   gava   guessen     gava             #    porguessen
SFX A   java   gessin      java             #    vengessin
SFX A   java   gessen      java             #    vengessen
SFX A   ava    a           ava              # 2. canta - imperatiu <IMP>
SFX A   ava    i           [^cçgjeiou]ava   # 3. canti
SFX A   ava    ï           [^aeiou][eio]ava #    canviï, suï
SFX A   iava   ï           [aeiou]iava      #    desmaï
SFX A   ava    ï           [gq]uiava        #    esquiï
SFX A   iava   ï           [^gq]uiava       #
SFX A   guava  güi         guava            #    enaigüi
SFX A   quava  qüi         quava            #    adeqüi
SFX A   uava   uï          [^gq]uava        #    evacuï
SFX A   cava   qui         cava             #    cerqui
SFX A   çava   ci          çava             #    caci
SFX A   gava   gui         gava             #    porgui
SFX A   java   gi          java             #    vengi
SFX A   ava    e           [^cçgju]ava      #    cante
SFX A   ava    e           [^gq]uava        #    sue
SFX A   guava  güe         guava            #    enaigüe
SFX A   quava  qüe         quava            #    adeqüe
SFX A   cava   que         cava             #    cerque 
SFX A   çava   ce          çava             #    cace 
SFX A   gava   gue         gava             #    porgue 
SFX A   java   ge          java             #    venge 
SFX A   ava    em          [^cçgju]ava      # 4. cantem
SFX A   ava    em          [^gq]uava        #    suem
SFX A   guava  güem        guava            #    enaigüem
SFX A   quava  qüem        quava            #    adeqüem
SFX A   cava   quem        cava             #    cerquem
SFX A   çava   cem         çava             #    cacem
SFX A   gava   guem        gava             #    porguem
SFX A   java   gem         java             #    vengem
SFX A   ava    eu          [^cçgju]ava      # 5. canteu
SFX A   ava    eu          [^gq]uava        #    sueu
SFX A   guava  güeu        guava            #    enaigüeu
SFX A   quava  qüeu        quava            #    adeqüeu
SFX A   cava   queu        cava             #    cerqueu
SFX A   çava   ceu         çava             #    caceu
SFX A   gava   gueu        gava             #    porgueu
SFX A   java   geu         java             #    vengeu
SFX A   ava    au          ava              #    cantau
SFX A   ava    in          [^cçgjeiou]ava   # 6. cantin
SFX A   ava    ïn          [^aeiou][eio]ava #    canviïn, suïn
SFX A   iava   ïn          [aeiou]iava      #    desmaïn
SFX A   ava    ïn          [gq]uiava        #    esquiïn
SFX A   iava   ïn          [^gq]uiava       #
SFX A   guava  güin        guava            #    enaigüin
SFX A   quava  qüin        quava            #    adeqüin
SFX A   uava   uïn         [^gq]uava        #    evacuïn
SFX A   cava   quin        cava             #    cerquin
SFX A   çava   cin         çava             #    cacin
SFX A   gava   guin        gava             #    porguin
SFX A   java   gin         java             #    vengin
SFX A   ava    en          [^cçgju]ava      #    canten
SFX A   ava    en          [^gq]uava        #    suen
SFX A   guava  güen        guava            #    enaigüen
SFX A   quava  qüen        quava            #    adeqüen
SFX A   cava   quen        cava             #    cerquen
SFX A   çava   cen         çava             #    cacen
SFX A   gava   guen        gava             #    porguen 
SFX A   java   gen         java             #    vengen
